Hawaii statutes.
§329C-3 Forfeiture. All imitation
controlled substances are subject to forfeiture according to the procedures set
forth in chapter 712A. [L 1984, c 222, pt of §1; am L 1989, c 261, §13]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next